Utah statutes.
67-3-1.5.   Fees of state auditor.

The state auditor shall receive the following fees:

For a copy of any paper filed or recorded in his office, 20 cents per folio.

For affixing certificate, with or without seal, $1.

For filing any paper not otherwise provided for, $1.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 46, 2001 General Session

